Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-383
Treatment by spiritual means alone; not considered abuse.

No person shall be considered to be abused for the sole reason that such person relies upon spiritual means alone for treatment in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination in lieu of medical treatment.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 36.